src/fst/morphology/stems/prefixes.lexc
LEXICON Prefixes

aero+Pref:aero»- # ;
afro+Pref:afro»- # ;
agro+Pref:agro»- # ;
ainu+Pref:ainu»- # ;
alg+Pref:˘alg»- # ;
alla+Pref:˘alla»- # ;
all+Pref:˘all»- # ;
alpi+Pref:alʲpi»- # ;
anglo+Pref:anglo»- # ;
anti+Pref:anʲti»- # ;
argi+Pref:argi»- # ;
astro+Pref:astro»- # ;
bio+Pref:b˘io»- # ;
dendro+Pref:d˘endro»- # ;
detsi+Pref:detsi»- # ;
digi+Pref:digi»- # ;
eba+Pref:eba»- # ;
eel+Pref:˘eel»- # ;
ees+Pref:˘ees»- # ;
eht+Pref:˘eht»- # ;
eks+Pref:˘eks»- # ;
elektro+Pref:el˘ektro»- # ;
emas+Pref:emas»- # ;
era+Pref:era»- # ;
esi+Pref:esi»- # ;
esma+Pref:esma»- # ;
euro+Pref:euro»- # ;
ferro+Pref:ferro»- # ;
finants+Pref:finˈanʲts»- # ;
geo+Pref:g˘eo»- # ;
haja+Pref:haja»- # ;
haju+Pref:haju»- # ;
hekto+Pref:hekto»- # ;
hiigel+Pref:h˘iigel»- # ;
hulgi+Pref:hulʲgi»- # ;
hüdro+Pref:hüdro»- # ;
hüper+Pref:hüper»- # ;
igi+Pref:igi»- # ;
ime+Pref:ime»- # ;
inim+Pref:inim»- # ;
intiim+Pref:intiim»- # ;
inva+Pref:inva»- # ;
isas+Pref:isas»- # ;
isoleer+Pref:isoleer»- # ;
iti+Pref:iti»- # ;
jae+Pref:j˘ae»- # ;
järel+Pref:järel»- # ;
kahend+Pref:kahend»- # ;
kaksis+Pref:kaksis»- # ;
kald+Pref:k˘ald»- # ;
kammer+Pref:kammer»- # ;
kaug+Pref:k˘aug»- # ;
kerg+Pref:k˘erg»- # ;
kesk+Pref:k˘esk»- # ;
kondens+Pref:kondˈens»- # ;
kookos+Pref:k˘ookos»- # ;
krüpto+Pref:krüpto»- # ;
kuning+Pref:kuning»- # ;
kvaasi+Pref:kvaasi»- # ;
kõrg+Pref:k˘õrg»- # ;
kõõrd+Pref:k˘õõrd»- # ;
kägi+Pref:kägi»- # ;
küber+Pref:küber»- # ;
külalis+Pref:külalis»- # ;
laus+Pref:l˘aus»- # ;
liblik+Pref:liblik»- # ;
linnalähi+Pref:linna#lähi»- # ;
lõhke+Pref:l˘õhke»- # ;
lähi+Pref:lähi»- # ;
lühimaa+Pref:lühi#m˘aa»- # ;
lühi+Pref:lühi»- # ;
meelis+Pref:meelis»- # ;
meta+Pref:meta»- # ;
meteo+Pref:meteo»- # ;
mikro+Pref:m˘ikro»- # ;
milli+Pref:milli»- # ;
mitte+Pref:m˘itte»- # ;
muidu+Pref:muidu»- # ;
muinas+Pref:muinas»- # ;
multi+Pref:mulʲti»- # ;
nais+Pref:n˘ais»- # ;
nano+Pref:nano»- # ;
narko+Pref:narko»- # ;
neo+Pref:n˘eo»- # ;
neuro+Pref:neuro»- # ;
nitro+Pref:n˘itro»- # ;
nuri+Pref:nuri»- # ;
nõuka+Pref:nõuka»- # ;
nöbi+Pref:nöbi»- # ;
nüüdis+Pref:nüüdis»- # ;
otse+Pref:otse»- # ;
paisk+Pref:p˘aisk»- # ;
paleo+Pref:paleo»- # ;
para+Pref:para»- # ;
pikamaa+Pref:pika#m˘aa»- # ;
piki+Pref:piki»- # ;
piko+Pref:piko»- # ;
pisi+Pref:pisi»- # ;
polaar+Pref:pol˘aar»- # ;
poliit+Pref:pol˘iit»- # ;
pool+Pref:p˘ool»- # ;
pop+Pref:p˘op»- # ;
pseudo+Pref:pseudo»- # ;
psühho+Pref:psühho»- # ;
puhke+Pref:p˘uhke»- # ;
puht+Pref:p˘uht»- # ;
puhtavee+Pref:p˘uhta#v˘ee»- # ;
põhi+Pref:põhi»- # ;
põiki+Pref:põiki»- # ;
põlis+Pref:põlis»- # ;
pöörd+Pref:p˘öörd»- # ;
püst+Pref:p˘üst»- # ;
raid+Pref:r˘aid»- # ;
ripp+Pref:r˘ipp»- # ;
roht+Pref:r˘oht»- # ;
rõht+Pref:r˘õht»- # ;
rööp+Pref:r˘ööp»- # ;
sega+Pref:sega»- # ;
siird+Pref:s˘iird»- # ;
sini+Pref:sini»- # ;
sirg+Pref:s˘irg»- # ;
sise+Pref:sise»- # ;
sisi+Pref:sisi»- # ;
supel+Pref:supel»- # ;
süva+Pref:süva»- # ;
taas+Pref:t˘aas»- # ;
taga+Pref:taga»- # ;
tehno+Pref:tehno»- # ;
termo+Pref:termo»- # ;
tetra+Pref:t˘etra»- # ;
toor+Pref:t˘oor»- # ;
tootmis+Pref:t˘ootmis»- # ;
topelt+Pref:topelt»- # ;
turbo+Pref:turbo»- # ;
umb+Pref:˘umb»- # ;
vaeg+Pref:v˘aeg»- # ;
vibro+Pref:vibro»- # ;
viitse+Pref:v˘iitse»- # ;
võrd+Pref:v˘õrd»- # ;
võõr+Pref:v˘õõr»- # ;
väli+Pref:väli»- # ;
välis+Pref:välis»- # ;
vääris+Pref:vääris»- # ;
äkk+Pref:˘äkk»- # ;
äädik+Pref:äädik»- # ;
öko+Pref:öko»- # ;
ühis+Pref:ühis»- # ;
üla+Pref:üla»- # ;
üld+Pref:˘üld»- # ;
üle+Pref:üle»- # ;
üli+Pref:üli»- # ;
ürg+Pref:˘ürg»- # ;
